Hawaii statutes.
§40-56 Warrants for supplies, incidentals.
Warrants for bills of materials, supplies, and incidentals of every kind and
character, shall be made payable to the order of each individual person to whom
the State is indebted, except as provided in section 40-58, and only after an
original warrant voucher shall have been presented to the comptroller or, in
the case of the University of Hawaii and the department of education, to their
respective chief financial officers accompanied by all original bills and any
other supporting document as may be required by the comptroller or the
respective chief financial officers of the University of Hawaii and the
department of education. The comptroller or the respective chief financial
officers of the University of Hawaii and department of education may accept an
electronically-mailed warrant voucher or other bill or supporting document as
an original warrant voucher, bill, or supporting document. The original
warrant voucher shall have indorsed thereon the approval of the officer in
whose department the liability or expense has been incurred, and the
appropriation to which it is chargeable; and further, each original bill shall
be specially certified by the subordinate officer of the State directly
incurring the liability or expense that all the materials, supplies, and
incidentals have been received in good order and condition, unless the bill is
for an advance payment or a deposit to be paid as specified in the department's
purchase order, in which case the certification of the original bill by the
subordinate officer is not required. Any advance payment made under this
section must conform to the common business practice for making such payment as
determined by the comptroller or the respective chief financial officers of the
University of Hawaii and the department of education. [L 1898, c 39, §11E; RL
1925, §1452; RL 1935, §579; RL 1945, §1583; RL 1955, §34-33; am L 1957, c 152,
§1; HRS §40-56; am L 1975, c 71, §3; am L 1986, c 3, §1 and c 94, §1; am L
2010, c 111, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next